Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article X Local Government

Section 1. Purpose and Construction.

The purpose of this article is to provide for maximum local self-government with a minimum of local government units, and to prevent duplication of tax-levying jurisdictions. A liberal construction shall be given to the powers of local government units.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions relating to liberal construction and extent of local powers, see AS

29.35.400

—

29.35.420

.

Section 2. Local Government Powers.

All local government powers shall be vested in boroughs and cities. The State may delegate taxing powers to organized boroughs and cities only.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A home rule city has the power to enact an ordinance exempting from local taxation any class of real or personal property, if such an exemption is not prohibited by the city’s home rule charter. 1969 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Section 3. Boroughs.

The entire State shall be divided into boroughs, organized or unorganized. They shall be established in a manner and according to standards provided by law. The standards shall include population, geography, economy, transportation, and other factors. Each borough shall embrace an area and population with common interests to the maximum degree possible. The legislature shall classify boroughs and prescribe their powers and functions. Methods by which boroughs may be organized, incorporated, merged, consolidated, reclassified, or dissolved shall be prescribed by law.

Section 4. Assembly.

The governing body of the organized borough shall be the assembly, and its composition shall be established by law or charter.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective October 14, 1972 (7th Legislature’s SJR 52 (1972)) deleted the second and third sentences which specified city and non-city representation on the borough assembly.

Section 5. Service Areas.

Service areas to provide special services within an organized borough may be established, altered, or abolished by the assembly, subject to the provisions of law or charter. A new service area shall not be established if, consistent with the purposes of this article, the new service can be provided by an existing service area, by incorporation as a city, or by annexation to a city. The assembly may authorize the levying of taxes, charges, or assessments within a service area to finance the special services.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The legislature could establish school service areas in an unorganized borough by general law subject to the restrictive limitations of this section. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 24.

A home rule city does not have unreined authority to create service areas and impose a tax rate on that service area without complying with statutory law. December 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 6. Unorganized Boroughs.

The legislature shall provide for the performance of services it deems necessary or advisable in unorganized boroughs, allowing for maximum local participation and responsibility. It may exercise any power or function in an unorganized borough which the assembly may exercise in an organized borough.

Section 7. Cities.

Cities shall be incorporated in a manner prescribed by law, and shall be a part of the borough in which they are located. Cities shall have the powers and functions conferred by law or charter. They may be merged, consolidated, classified, reclassified, or dissolved in the manner provided by law.

Section 8. Council.

The governing body of a city shall be the council.

Section 9. Charters.

The qualified voters of any borough of the first class or city of the first class may adopt, amend, or repeal a home rule charter in a manner provided by law. In the absence of such legislation, the governing body of a borough or city of the first class shall provide the procedure for the preparation and adoption or rejection of the charter. All charters, or parts or amendments of charters, shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the borough or city, and shall become effective if approved by a majority of those who vote on the specific question.

Section 10. Extended Home Rule.

The legislature may extend home rule to other boroughs and cities.

Section 11. Home Rule Powers.

A home rule borough or city may exercise all legislative powers not prohibited by law or by charter.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A home rule city has the power to enact an ordinance exempting from local taxation any class of real or personal property, if such an exemption is not prohibited by the city’s home rule charter. 1969 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

A home rule municipality duly incorporated under the laws of Alaska may establish and operate a local housing authority so as to fall within the definition of “public housing agencies” under the 1974 revision of the United States Housing Act of 1937, P.L. 93-388, 42 U.S.C.A. §§ 1437, 1437a(6). February 2, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

A Proposition 13 initiative which reads: “The municipality of
_______________
may not levy and tax for any purpose in excess of one percent of the assessed value of property within the municipality” would, as a practical matter, unconstitutionally impair the obligation of existing contracts any municipality has made to borrow money by general obligation bonds, and, additionally, would directly conflict with the policy adopted by AS 29.53.055 (now see AS

29.45.100

) to levy such taxes at such rates as are required to repay general obligation bonds; as such, it would be void. August 29, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

Mere inconsistency with a state statute is not sufficient to invalidate a municipal ordinance as unconstitutional. May 12, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

A municipality enacting a local district coastal management program may restrict or exclude a use of state concern without falling afoul of the constitutional limitations in this section on the exercise of municipal authority if that restriction or exclusion is reasonable, within the meaning of AS 46.40.070(c). May 12, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

Municipal authority to regulate oil and gas activities of federal lessees depends upon whether the leases are on-shore or off-shore. In the case of the former, the doctrine of federal preemption may prohibit local coastal zone ordinances from affecting any measure of control. In the case of the latter, local coastal management programs which are approved by the Alaska Coastal Policy Council and thus part of the Alaska Coastal Management Program will become one of the touchstones in the state consistency determination required by section 307(c)(3) of the Coastal Zone Management Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq. May 12, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 12. Boundaries.

A local boundary commission or board shall be established by law in the executive branch of the state government. The commission or board may consider any proposed local government boundary change. It may present proposed changes to the legislature during the first ten days of any regular session. The change shall become effective forty-five days after presentation or at the end of the session, whichever is earlier, unless disapproved by a resolution concurred in by a majority of the members of each house. The commission or board, subject to law, may establish procedures whereby boundaries may be adjusted by local action.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning the local boundary commission, see AS

44.33.810

—

44.33.828

.

Section 13. Agreements; Transfer of Powers.

Agreements, including those for cooperative or joint administration of any functions or powers, may be made by any local government with any other local government, with the State, or with the United States, unless otherwise provided by law or charter. A city may transfer to the borough in which it is located any of its powers or functions unless prohibited by law or charter, and may in like manner revoke the transfer.

Section 14. Local Government Agency.

An agency shall be established by law in the executive branch of the state government to advise and assist local governments. It shall review their activities, collect and publish local government information, and perform other duties prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

The agency established in the executive branch to advise and assist local governments is the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development (AS 44.33).

Section 15. Special Service Districts.

Special service districts existing at the time a borough is organized shall be integrated with the government of the borough as provided by law.